Massachusetts, session 194th, H1629.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 258 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby by amended by striking out, in line 5, the figure “$1,000,000” and
inserting in place thereof the following figure:-
“$5,000,000”
of 1